Missouri, session 2026, SB1569.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.1243, to read as
follows:
376.1243. 1. Each health carrier or health benefit
plan that offers or issues health benefit plans that are
delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in
this state on or after January 1, 2027, shall provide
coverage for the treatment of perimenopause, menopause, and
postmenopause, including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Hormone therapy, including, but not limited to,
combined estrogen and hormone medicines, combination
estrogen and progesterone medicines, and estrogen-only
medicines;
(2) Selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs)
and serotonin-norepinephrine reuptake inhibitors (SNRIs);
(3) Vaginal estrogen;
(4) Medications to prevent or treat osteoporosis;
(5) Neurokinin B antagonists;
(6) Topical hormone therapy; and
(7) Bioidentical hormones.

SB 1569 2
2. The coverage provided under this section shall be
limited to those drugs and medications that have been
approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.
3. The coverage required under this section shall not
be subject to any greater deductible or copayment than other
similar health care services provided by the health benefit
plan.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a
supplemental insurance policy, including a life care
contract, accident-only policy, specified disease policy,
hospital policy providing a fixed daily benefit only,
Medicare supplement policy, long-term care policy, short-
term major medical policies of six months' or less duration,
or any other supplemental policy as determined by the
director of the department of commerce and insurance.
✓